Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 2. Penalties upon Voters

§ 1971.
Casting more than one ballot.

A legal voter who knowingly casts more than one ballot at any one time of balloting for the same office shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 if the offense is committed at a primary or general election, and not more than $100.00 if committed at a local election.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 5

, § 10;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1972.
Showing ballot; interference with voter.

A voter who, except in cases of assistance as provided in this title, allows his or her ballot to be seen by another person with an apparent intention of letting it be known how he or she is about to vote or makes a false statement to the presiding officer at an election as to his or her inability to mark his or her ballot or places a distinguishing mark on his or her ballot or a person who interferes with a voter when inside the guard rail or who, within the building in which the voting is proceeding, endeavors to induce a voter to vote for a particular candidate, shall be fined $1,000.00.

It shall be the duty of the election officers to see that the offender is duly prosecuted for a violation of this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 5

, § 11;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1973.
Voting in more than one place.

A person who, on the same day, votes in more than one town, district, or ward for the same office shall be fined not more than $1,000.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 5

, § 12.

§ 1974.
Voter omitted from list, voting in another political subdivision.

A person who is a resident and entitled to vote in a political subdivision in which a checklist of voters has been made previous to an election, whose name, through his or her neglect, is not entered thereon, who votes in another political subdivision at such election shall be fined not more than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.